wichi.foma
### wichi.foma ###

# Vowels
define V [ a | e | i | o | u ];

read lexc wichi.lexc
define Lexicon;

################################## TODO ########################################

# account for the lengthening of j depending on vowel before it in HDeletion
# fix K affrication UNCOMPILED

################################################################################

# K affrication: k changes to ch [e|i] and before another vowel
define KAffrication k -> ch || [e|i] _ ("^") ("%'") V ; # Must come b/f StopAsperation

# Stop aspiration: voiceless stops become aspirated before -h
define StopAsperation p -> PH, t -> TH, k -> KH, ch -> CH || _ ("^") h ;

# Nasal & Glide devoicing: nasals & glides are devoiced and aspirated before -h
define NGDevoicing m -> MH, n -> NH, y -> YH, w -> WH || _ "^" h ;

# H deletion: the -h of -hen disappears when preceded by nasals and glides
define HDeletion h -> 0 || [MH|NH|YH|WH|fw|s|lh|j] "^" _ e n ;

# J palatalization: j /x/ changes to sh /ʃ/ after [e|i] and before another vowel
define JPalatalization j -> sh || [e|i] _ ("^") V ; # Must come after HDeletion

# Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

read lexc wichi2.lexc
define Lexicon

define Grammar Lexicon           .o.
               KAffrication      .o.
               StopAsperation    .o.
               NGDevoicing       .o.
               HDeletion         .o.
               JPalatalization   .o.
               Cleanup;

regex Grammar;
